Connecticut, session 2026, HB05434.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 9-453b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
The Secretary of the State shall not issue any nominating petition
forms for a candidate for an office to be filled at a regular election to be
held in any year prior to the first business day of such year. The
Secretary shall not issue any nominating petition forms unless the
person requesting the nominating petition forms makes a written
application for such forms, which application shall contain the
following: (1) The name or names of the candidates to appear on such
nominating petition, compared by the town clerk of the town of
residence of each candidate with the candidate's name as it appears on
the last-completed registry list of such town, and verified and corrected
by such town clerk or in the case of a newly admitted elector whose
HB5434 / File No. 519 1

HB5434 File No. 519
name does not appear on the last-completed registry list, the town clerk
shall compare the candidate's name as it appears on the candidate's
application for admission and verify and correct it accordingly; (2) a
signed statement by each such candidate that the candidate consents to
the placing of the candidate's name on such petition; and (3) the party
designation, if any. An applicant for petition forms who does not wish
to specify a party designation shall so indicate on the application for
such forms and the application, if so marked, shall not be amended in
this respect. No application made after November 3, 1981, shall contain
any party designation unless a reservation of such party designation
with the Secretary is in effect for all of the offices included in the
application or unless the party designation is the same as the name of a
minor party [which] that is qualified for a different office or offices on
the same ballot as the office or offices included in the application or that
is described in subparagraph (B) of subdivision (6) of section 9-372, as
amended by this act. The Secretary shall not issue such forms (A) unless
the application for forms on behalf of a candidate for the office of
presidential elector is accompanied by the names of the candidates for
President and Vice-President whom the candidate for the office of
presidential elector represents and includes the consent of such
candidates for President and Vice-President; (B) unless the application
for forms on behalf of Governor or Lieutenant Governor is accompanied
by the name of the candidate for the other office and includes the
consent of both such candidates; (C) if petition forms have previously
been issued on behalf of the same candidate for the same office unless
the candidate files a written statement of withdrawal of the candidate's
previous candidacy with the Secretary; and (D) unless the application
meets the requirements of this section. A candidacy for nomination by
nominating petition to a district or municipal office may be filed on
behalf of any person whose name appears on the last-completed registry
list of the district or municipality represented by such office, as the case
may be. A candidacy for nomination by nominating petition to a state
office may be filed on behalf of any person whose name appears on the
last-completed registry list of the state.
Sec. 2. Section 9-372 of the general statutes is repealed and the
HB5434 / File No. 519 2

HB5434 File No. 519
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
The following terms, as used in this chapter, chapter 157 and sections
9-51 to 9-67, inclusive, 9-169e, 9-217, 9-236 and 9-361, shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Caucus" means any meeting, at a designated hour and place, or
at designated hours and places, of the enrolled members of a political
party within a municipality or political subdivision thereof for the
purpose of selecting party-endorsed candidates for a primary to be held
by such party or for the purpose of transacting other business of such
party;
(2) "Convention" means a meeting of delegates of a political party
held for the purpose of designating the candidate or candidates to be
endorsed by such party in a primary of such party for state or district
office or for the purpose of transacting other business of such party;
(3) "District" means any geographic portion of the state which crosses
the boundary or boundaries between two or more towns;
(4) "District office" means an elective office for which only the electors
in a district, as defined in subdivision (3) of this section, may vote;
(5) "Major party" means (A) a political party or organization whose
candidate for Governor at the last-preceding election for Governor
received, under the designation of that political party or organization,
at least twenty per cent of the whole number of votes cast for all
candidates for Governor, or (B) a political party having, at the last-
preceding election for Governor, a number of enrolled members on the
active registry list equal to at least twenty per cent of the total number
of enrolled members of all political parties on the active registry list in
the state;
(6) "Minor party" means (A) a political party or organization [which]
that is not a major party and whose candidate for the office in question
received at the last-preceding regular election for such office, under the
designation of that political party or organization, at least one per cent
HB5434 / File No. 519 3

HB5434 File No. 519
of the whole number of votes cast for all candidates for such office at
such election, or (B) with respect to a candidate applying to appear on a
nominating petition for any office in accordance with the provisions of
section 9-453b, as amended by this act, a political party or organization
that is not a major party and whose candidate for a state office received
at the last-preceding regular election for such state office, under the
designation of that political party or organization, at least one per cent
of the whole number of votes cast for all candidates for such state office
at such election;
(7) "Municipal office" means an elective office for which only the
electors of a single town, city, borough, or political subdivision, as
defined in subdivision (10) of this section, may vote, including the office
of justice of the peace;
(8) "Party designation committee" means an organization, composed
of at least twenty-five members who are electors, [which] that has, on or
after November 4, 1981, reserved a party designation with the Secretary
of the State pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(9) "Party-endorsed candidate" means (A) in the case of a candidate
for state or district office, a person endorsed by the convention of a
political party as a candidate in a primary to be held by such party, and
100 (B) in the case of a candidate for municipal office or for member of a
101 town committee, a person endorsed by the town committee, caucus or
102 convention, as the case may be, of a political party as a candidate in a
103 primary to be held by such party;
104 (10) "Political subdivision" means any voting district or combination
105 of voting districts constituting a part of a municipality;
106 (11) "Primary" means a meeting of the enrolled members of a political
107 party and, when applicable under section 9-431, unaffiliated electors,
108 held during consecutive hours at which such members or electors may,
109 without assembling at the same hour, vote by secret ballot for
110 candidates for nomination to office or for town committee members;
HB5434 / File No. 519 4

HB5434 File No. 519
111 (12) "Registrar" means the registrar of voters in a municipality who is
112 enrolled with the political party holding a primary and, in each
113 municipality where there are different registrars for different voting
114 districts, means the registrar so enrolled in the voting district in which,
115 at the last-preceding regular election, the presiding officer for the
116 purpose of declaring the result of the vote of the whole municipality was
117 moderator;
118 (13) "Slate" means a group of candidates for nomination by a political
119 party to the office of justice of the peace of a town, which group numbers
120 at least a bare majority of the number of justices of the peace to be
121 nominated by such party for such town;
122 (14) "State office" means any office for which all the electors of the
123 state may vote and includes the office of Governor, Lieutenant
124 Governor, Secretary, Treasurer, Comptroller, Attorney General and
125 senator in Congress, but does not include the office of elector of
126 President and Vice-President of the United States;
127 (15) "Votes cast for the same office at the last-preceding election" or
128 "votes cast for all candidates for such office at the last-preceding
129 election" means, in the case of multiple openings for the same office, the
130 total number of electors checked as having voted at the last-preceding
131 election at which such office appeared on the ballot.
132 Sec. 3. Section 9-66 of the general statutes is repealed and the
133 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
134 The provisions of sections 9-51 to 9-67, inclusive, shall extend only to
135 (A) any major party as defined in subdivision (5) of section 9-372, as
136 amended by this act, and (B) any minor party as defined in subdivision
137 (6) of section 9-372, as amended by this act. In the case of a major party,
138 such provisions shall apply state-wide. In the case of a minor party, such
139 provisions shall apply within the geographical jurisdiction of the office
140 or offices to which such minor party status pertains, as provided in
141 subdivision (6) of section 9-372, as amended by this act.
HB5434 / File No. 519 5

HB5434 File No. 519
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 9-453b
Sec. 2 January 1, 2027 9-372
Sec. 3 January 1, 2027 9-66
GAE Joint Favorable
HB5434 / File No. 519 6

HB5434 File No. 519
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill expands ballot access for minor parties if a candidate
nominated by that party for state office received at least 1% of the vote
in the last election, which results in no fiscal impact to the state or
municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5434 / File No. 519 7

HB5434 File No. 519
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5434
AN ACT CONCERNING STATE-WIDE RECOGNITION OF MINOR
PARTIES FOR PURPOSES OF NOMINATING PETITIONS.